pt-PT: Tipo de base do saco de areia: Sem fundo com forro incluído; Fundo aberto (contacto com o solo); Painel de fundo amovível; Fundo sólido; Outro
nb: Sandkassebunntype: Uten bunn med medfølgende duk; Åpen bunn (bakkekontakt); Avtakbart bunnpanel; Fast bunn; Annet
fr: Type de fond du bac à sable: Sans fond, avec bâche incluse; Fond ouvert (contact avec le sol); Panneau de fond amovible; Fond rigide; Autre
zh-TW: 沙箱底部類型: 無底座附內襯; 開放式底部 (接觸地面); 可拆卸底板; 實心底部; 其他
el: Τύπος βάσης αμμοδόχου: Χωρίς πάτο, περιλαμβάνεται επένδυση; Ανοιχτός πάτος (επαφή με το έδαφος); Αφαιρούμενος πάτος; Συμπαγής πάτος; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta dna peskovnika: Brez dna z vključeno podlogo; Odprto dno (v stiku s tlemi); Odstranljiva spodnja plošča; Polno dno; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta dna pješčanika: Bez dna s uključenom podlogom; Otvoreno dno (kontakt s tlom); Uklonjiva donja ploča; Puno dno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип дъно на пясъчник: Без дъно (с включена подложка); Отворено дъно (контакт със земята); Подвижен долен панел; Твърдо дъно; Друго
zh-CN: 沙池底部类型: 无底附带内衬; 开放式底部（接触地面）; 可拆卸底板; 实心底部; 其他
sk-SK: Typ dna pieskoviska: Bez dna, s podložkou; Otvorené dno (kontakt so zemou); Odnímateľný spodný panel; Pevné dno; Iné
lt-LT: Smėlio dėžės dugno tipas: Be dugno, su įdėklu; Atviras dugnas (liečiasi su žeme); Nuimamas dugno skydas; Vientisas dugnas; Kita
ru: Тип дна песочницы: Без дна (с подкладкой в комплекте); Открытое дно (контакт с землей); Съемная нижняя панель; Сплошное дно; Другой
de: Typ des Sandkastenbodens: Bodenlos inkl. Folie; Offener Boden (Bodenkontakt); Herausnehmbare Bodenplatte; Fester Boden; Sonstige
fi: Hiekkalaatikon pohjan tyyppi: Pohjaton, sisältää aluskankaan; Avoin pohja (maakosketus); Irrotettava pohjapaneeli; Kiinteä pohja; Muu
it: Tipo di fondo della sabbiera: Senza fondo, con telo incluso; Fondo aperto (a contatto con il suolo); Pannello di fondo rimovibile; Fondo solido; Altro
ko: 샌드박스 바닥 유형: 바닥 없음(라이너 포함); 개방형 바닥(지면 접촉); 탈착식 바닥 패널; 솔리드 바닥; 기타
vi: Đáy hộp cát: Không đáy, kèm theo tấm lót; Đáy hở (tiếp xúc mặt đất); Tấm đáy có thể tháo rời; Đáy nguyên khối; Khác
pt-BR: Caixa de areia tipo de fundo: Sem fundo, com forro incluído; Fundo aberto (contato com o solo); Painel inferior removível; Fundo sólido; Outros
da: Sandkassebundtype: Bundløs, med underlag; Åben bund (jordkontakt); Aftageligt bundpanel; Fast bund; Andet
tr: Kum havuzu taban tipi: Tabansız, astar dahil; Açık taban (zemin temaslı); Çıkarılabilir alt panel; Sabit taban; Diğer
en: Sandbox bottom type: Bottomless with liner included; Open bottom (ground contact); Removable bottom panel; Solid bottom; Other
cs: Typ dna pískoviště: Bez dna, včetně podložky; Otevřené dno (kontakt se zemí); Odnímatelný spodní panel; Pevné dno; Jiné
ja: 砂場底型: 底なし (ライナー付き); オープンボトム (地面接地); 取り外し可能な底面パネル; 密閉底; その他
pl: Typ dna piaskownicy: Bez dna z matą w zestawie; Bez dna (kontakt z podłożem); Wyjmowany panel dolny; Z dnem; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de bază pentru lada cu nisip: Fără fund, cu folie inclusă; Fund deschis (contact cu solul); Panou de bază detașabil; Fund solid; Altele
hu: Homokozó aljának típusa: Alj nélküli, béléssel; Nyitott alj (földdel érintkező); Kivehető alsó panel; Zárt alj; Egyéb
es: Tipo de base del arenero: Sin fondo con revestimiento incluido; Fondo abierto (contacto con el suelo); Panel inferior extraíble; Fondo sólido; Otro
sv: Sandlådans bottentyp: Bottenlös med medföljande markduk; Öppen botten (markkontakt); Avtagbar bottenpanel; Hel botten; Övrigt
nl: Zandbak bodemtype: Bodemloos (inclusief voering); Open bodem (grondcontact); Verwijderbaar bodempaneel; Vaste bodem; Overige
th: ประเภทก้นกระบะทราย: ไม่มีก้นและมาพร้อมแผ่นรอง; เปิดก้น(สัมผัสพื้น); แผ่นรองก้นถอดออกได้; ก้นทึบ; อื่นๆ